Utah statutes.
41-6a-1612.   Back-up lamps -- Side marker lamps.

(1) (a)  A motor vehicle may be equipped with one or more back-up lamps either separately or in combination with other lamps.

(b)  A back-up lamp or lamps may not be lighted when the motor vehicle is in forward motion.

(c)  A lighted back-up lamp shall emit a white light.

(2)  A vehicle may be equipped with one or more side marker lamps that may be flashed in conjunction with turn or vehicular hazard warning signals.

(3)  A back-up lamp and side marker lamp under this section shall comply with rules made by the department under Section 41-6a-1601.

